Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 4 Division of Information Systems
Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 38, §§ 23, 24: Feb. 4, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an immediate need to establish a more responsive and responsible state government sufficiently flexible to meet changing conditions and to establish executive authority in those areas where executive responsibility presently lies and to promote economies in the operation of the government by the consolidation of various departments, boards, and commissions; and that only by the immediate passage of this act may procedures be established for effectuating a more responsive, responsible, and economic state government. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 340, § 5: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that the provisions of this Act are essential to the operation of the institutions named herein. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1977, No. 787, § 16: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1977 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1977 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1981, No. 764, § 13: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly that various programs now administered by the Department of Local Services could more appropriately be administered by other existing agencies which administer similar and related programs; that this Act is designed to accomplish this purpose and in order to assure an orderly transition and consolidation of such programs it is essential that this Act become effective on July 1, 1981; that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1981, is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1981, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1983, No. 307, § 11: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 348, § 16: July 1, 1985.

Acts 1985, No. 772, § 19: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1985 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1985 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1987, No. 961, § 25: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 44, § 18: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 68, § 33: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 1082, § 28: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 1085, § 35: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 1239, § 125: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, Section 119 shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of passage and approval and the remainder of the Act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 1198, § 110: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety; Section 99 shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of passage and approval and the remainder of the Act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 324, § 9: Mar. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1360, § 132: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, Section 115 shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of passage and approval and the remainder of the Act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2003, No. 1717, § 3: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to preserve the efficient operation of programs that deliver services for the prevention and treatment of alcohol and drug abuse in Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2007, No. 384, § 11: Mar. 19, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that many services delivered by the various divisions, offices, and units the Department of Health and Human Services are essential to the public health, safety, and welfare; that the state fiscal year begins July 1; that beginning the process of decoupling the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services from the Department of Health and Human Services during a fiscal year will cause disruptions of services and unnecessary time, effort, and expense in reallocating appropriations, budgets, personnel, equipment, and capital expenditures during a fiscal year; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay beyond the beginning of the fiscal year will disrupt essential programs and services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 5: provided: “This act shall take effect upon the occurrence of the following: (1) The Director of the Division of Aging and Adult Services of the Department of Health and Human Services determines that adequate appropriation, funding, and positions are available to carry out a public guardianship program for adults; and (2) The director appoints an employee of the Division of Aging and Adult Services to serve as Public Guardian for Adults.”

Acts 2009, No. 778, § 4: Apr. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the transportation of children is an integral part of child care services and subjects the children to a risk of injury which can be minimalized and insured against; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide protection to children served by various child care centers. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 528, § 6: Mar. 28, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the home visiting networks provide important services to Arkansas's most vulnerable citizens, our infants and toddlers; that the agencies administering home visiting programs need to ensure the accountability of these programs; and that these changes need to be made immediately so that planning and coordination among the agencies comply in a timely manner with the reporting requirements. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1499, § 5: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the oversight and audit of the state's Medicaid program is essential to its continued operation; that the creation of the Office of the Medicaid Inspector General will ensure that fraud, waste, and abuse are found in a timely manner; and that this act is necessary to ensure that state and federal monies are not misspent. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July, 1, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning creation of the department and appointment of the director, was repealed by 2019, No. 910, § 5241, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 38, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-912; Acts 2005, No. 1954, § 8; Acts 2007, No. 384, § 8.

The Division of County Operations;

The Division of Youth Services;

The Division of Children and Family Services;

The Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education; and

The Division of Provider Services and Quality Assurance.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

From time to time, the secretary may transfer or assign existing duties or new programs or duties of the department to offices, sections, or units as he or she deems necessary for the efficient and necessary operation of the department.

Before implementation of any reorganization, the secretary shall obtain the advice of the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.

However, the state institutions and the operation of state institutional programs under the jurisdiction of the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services and the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board shall be under the control of their respective boards, as provided by law.

The Board of Developmental Disabilities Services and the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board shall perform their respective functions and duties under the general guidelines and standards promulgated by the secretary.

“Records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds of the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services;

“Authority, powers, duties, and functions as established by law for the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services, including purchasing, budgeting, fiscal, accounting, human resources, payroll, legal, information systems, maintenance, program support, administrative support, and other management functions;

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1985, No. 348, § 1, provided, in part, that all divisions, offices, sections, bureaus, and units, all boards, other than the State Hospital Board, the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services, the Arkansas Youth Services Board, the Division of State Services for the Blind, the Board of the Division of State Services for the Blind, and all other boards and programs specifically continued under the act which existed within the Department of Human Services on July 1, 1985, were abolished and their powers and duties transferred to the nine (9) divisions established by the act as determined by the Director of the Department of Human Services with the advice of the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.

The section further provided that the Division of State Services for the Blind and the Board of the Division of State Services for the Blind, §25-10-201 et seq., would continue to function within the Department of Human Services with the same powers prescribed in §25-10-201 et seq. but that, for organizational purposes, they should be assigned to divisions or offices of the department as determined by the director. The Office on Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention and the Arkansas Alcohol and Drug Abuse Authority would continue to function within the department as outlined in §20-64-601 et seq. The Long-Term Care Facility Advisory Board, §20-10-301, the Office of Long-Term Care, §20-10-101 et seq., and the Child Care Facility Review Board, §20-78-201 et seq., and their powers and duties, would continue and would be assigned to other divisions or offices of the department as determined by the director. The Advisory Committee on Child Placement was continued and the powers and duties of the Commissioner of the Division of Social Services under §9-28-401 et seq. were to be performed by the other divisions or offices of the department as determined by the director.

Acts 1985, No. 348, § 12, provided, in part, that if, as a result of the reorganization of the Department of Human Services, any of the facilities or any space in any of the facilities belonging to or assigned to the State Hospital Board, the Youth Services Board, the Developmental Disabilities Services Board, or any of the institutions under the management and control of those boards was no longer required to provide services of the institution, the Governor could transfer the facility or space within any facility to the Department of Human Services to be used in performing its functions and duties. Before transferring facilities or space, the Governor must confer with the board having charge over the facility and give the Director of the Department of Human Services an opportunity to outline the department's needs for space and the purpose for which the space would be used if made available to the department.

Acts 1985, No. 772, § 14, provided that in order to accomplish the reorganization, any laws or parts of laws in effect at the time of the passage of the reorganization law which referred to specific divisions or entities in the Department of Human Services would be construed to refer to the successor entity designated by the Director of the Department of Human Services in accordance with the reorganization. It further provided that nothing in the reorganization would affect the orders, rules, regulations, and standards previously promulgated by any department, division, bureau, board, commission, council, or other section of the Department of Human Services, whose functions, powers, and duties were assigned or transferred to a successor entity designated by the director in implementing the reorganization of the department. Those orders, rules, regulations, and standards would continue with full force and effect until amended or repealed pursuant to law.

Acts 1987, No. 921, § 14, provided that:

“It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly that regional offices tend to create inefficiency in the operation of the programs and services provided by the Department of Human Services. Therefore, no office of the Department of Human Services shall be called a “Regional Office”, nor shall any function of any office, other than the Department of Human Services Central Office, include supervision of any district Department of Human Services Office.”

Acts 1989, No. 60 created the Division on Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention within the Department of Human Services and provided that references to the Office of Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention shall be applicable to the Division on Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention.

Acts 1993, No. 574, § 1, provided:

“Effective July 1, 1993, the Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Human Services is transferred to the Division of Vocational and Technical Education of the Department of Education, and shall be known as the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services. The State Board of Vocational Education shall have the same authority and responsibility with respect to the administration and operation of the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services as it has with respect to the Division of Vocational and Technical Education.”

Acts 1993, No. 574, § 2, provided:

“The policy and scope of the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services shall be to provide increased employment of individuals with disabilities through the provision of individualized training, independent living services, educational and support services, and meaningful opportunities for employment in integrated work settings to maximize employment, economic self-sufficiency, independence, and inclusion and integration into society.

“Pursuant to such policy, rehabilitation services shall be provided to citizens throughout the state and the rehabilitation plan adopted pursuant to this act shall be in effect in all political subdivisions of the state.”

Acts 1993, No. 574, § 3, provided:

“All authorities and responsibilities defined in Act 43 of 1955 as amended shall be administered by the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services, under the direction of the State Board of Vocational Education except those transferred to the Division of State Services for the Blind by Act 481 of 1983.”

Acts 1993, No. 574, § 5, provided:

“The State Board of Vocational Education, through the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services, shall provide the rehabilitation services authorized by this act to eligible physically or mentally disabled individuals and those who can benefit from independent living services, determined by the agency to be eligible therefor, and, in carrying out the purposes of this act, the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services is authorized, among other things:

“(a)to be the sole state agency to supervise and administer the rehabilitation services authorized by this act except such part or parts as may be administered by a local agency in a political subdivision of the state, in which case the service shall be the sole agency to supervise such local agency in the administration of such part or parts; and

“(b)to conduct research and compile statistics relative to the provision of services or the need of services of disabled individuals.”

Acts 1993, No. 574, § 6, provided:

“Any and all statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, authorized positions, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations or other funds, transferred from the Division of Rehabilitative Services to the Department of Human Services by Act 348 of 1985 are hereby transferred to the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the Division of Vocational and Technical Education of the Department of Education.”

Acts 1993, No. 574, § 8, provided:

“The Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Human Services as now constituted shall continue in existence for all purposes, intact, until July 1, 1993, at which time said Division shall be transferred to the Division of Vocational and Technical Education of the Department of Education. The transfer shall include all employees, powers, duties, licenses, privileges, equipment, vehicles, furniture, fixtures, supplies, books, records, stock, goods, funds, unexpended appropriations and facilities relating to rehabilitation services and training. The Department of Human Services will transfer appropriate positions, as identified by the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services, necessary to meet Arkansas Rehabilitation Services administration and program support needs in numbers not to exceed those transferred from the Division of Rehabilitation Services to the Department of Human Services by Acts 348 and 752 of 1985.”

Acts 2005, No. 1954, § 1, provided:

“Legislative purpose.

“(a)The General Assembly declares that this act is necessary to:

“(1)Improve the health of the citizens of Arkansas in an effective and efficient manner; and

“(2)Provide for administrative cost savings in the delivery of health-related programs by combining overlapping functions and eliminating duplications of functions of the Department of Health and the Department of Human Services.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for an orderly transfer of powers, authorities, duties, and functions of the Department of Health to the Department of Human Services with a minimum of disruption of governmental services and functions and with a minimum of expense.”

Acts 2005, No. 1954, § 3, provided:

“Transfer of the Department of Health into the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(a)(1)(A)Effective at 12:01 AM on July 1, 2005, the Department of Health is transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(B)Effective at 12:01 AM on July 1, 2005, the Department of Health shall be named and shall be known as the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(2)All authority, powers, duties, and functions as established by law for the Department of Health, including all purchasing, budgeting, fiscal, accounting, human resources, payroll, legal, information systems, maintenance, program support, administrative support, and other management functions are transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(3)(A)All records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds are transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services for use by the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(B)(i)All powers, duties, and functions, including, but not limited to, rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders and adjudications as established by law for the Department of Health are transferred to the Director of the Department of Health and Human Services, except as specified in this act.

“(ii)All powers, duties, and functions, including, but not limited to, rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, standards, all budgetary responsibilities, and the rendering of findings, orders and adjudications as established by law for the Breast Cancer Control Program or other transferred entities within the Department of Health shall be retained exactly as they were prior to the implementation of this act.

“(b)Nothing in this act shall be construed to increase the authority or powers of the Director of the Department of Health and Human Services or the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services beyond those already conferred upon the Director of the Department of Health or the Department of Health, except as specifically defined in this act.

“(c)The Director of the Department of Health and Human Services shall appoint and employ the Director of the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(d)The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall replace “Department of Health” in the Arkansas Code with “Department of Health and Human Services.”

Acts 2007, No. 384, § 1, provides:

“Creation of the Department of Health.

“(a)“There is created the Department of Health, that is to be established if the Governor orders the separation of the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services from the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(b)“If the Governor establishes the Department of Health under subsection (a) of this section, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall replace all references in the Arkansas Code to the:

“(1)“Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services” or “Division of Health” with “Department of Health”; and “(2)“Department of Health and Human Services” with “Department of Human Services”.

“(c)“Sections 2 through 12 of this act become effective only if the Governor establishes the Department of Health under subsection (a) of this section.”

Acts 2007, No. 384, § 2, provides:

“Transfer of the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services out of the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(a)“Effective sixty (60) days after the Governor establishes the Department of Health under this act, and as provided in the orders of the Governor, the following may be transferred to the Department of Health:

“Rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications as established by law for the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services, except as otherwise specified in this act.

“(b)“Powers, duties, and functions, including without limitation, rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, budgetary responsibilities, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications as established by law for the Breast Cancer Control Program or other transferred entities within the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services shall be retained as they existed on June 30, 2005.

“(c)“The Governor may appoint a Surgeon General in accordance with §20-7-103.”

Acts 2007, No. 384, § 3, provides:

“Transfer of the State Board of Health to the Department of Health.

“(a)“Effective sixty (60) days after the Department of Health is established, the State Board of Health shall be transferred to the Department of Health.

“(b)“The State Board of Health shall receive administrative support from the Department of Health and shall retain the same powers, authorities, duties, and functions prescribed by law as it had before the transfer and shall have all rule-making authority prescribed by law to the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services before the transfer, except as provided for in this act, including, without limitation:

“(1)“Rule making, licensing, and registration;

“(2)“The promulgation of rules, rates, and standards;

“(3)“Examining, investigating, inspecting, and reviewing; and

“(4)“The rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications.”

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 1, provided:

“Legislative findings.

“The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Many adults lack the capacity to provide informed consent to necessary health care, have not executed an advance health care directive or a durable power of attorney, and have no friend or family member qualified and willing to consent on their behalf; and

“(2)It is therefore necessary for the preservation of the public health and safety to provide for a public guardian who can make informed consent to needed medical and long-term care on behalf of incapacitated adults who are unable to consent for themselves and for whom there is no other person qualified and willing to consent.”

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 5, provided:

“Contingent effectiveness.

“This act shall take effect upon the occurrence of the following:

“(1)The Director of the Division of Aging and Adult Services of the Department of Health and Human Services determines that adequate appropriation, funding, and positions are available to carry out a public guardianship program for adults; and

“(2)The director appoints an employee of the Division of Aging and Adult Services to serve as Public Guardian for Adults.”

Acts 2013, No. 980, § 25, provided: “The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement the name change under Section 18 of this act.”

Acts 2013, No. 1107, § 48, provided: “The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement the name change under Section 46 of this act.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment deleted (a) and redesignated the subsequent subsections accordingly; inserted “Services” in (a)(3), and deleted (a)(12); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “Community Service and Nonprofit Support” for “Volunteerism” in (a)(8).

The 2013 amendments by Nos. 980 and 1107, in (a)(3), added “Services” after “Behavioral Health” and deleted “and the Office of Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention” after “state hospitals.”

The 2015 amendment redesignated former (a)(1)(A) as (a)(1); and deleted former (a)(1)(B).

The 2017 amendment inserted “programmatic” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Aging and Adult Services” in (a)(1); deleted former (a)(3), (a)(6), and (a)(8), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted “which shall include both community programs and human development centers” at the end of (a)(3); deleted “which shall include serious offender and community-based programs and the youth service centers” at the end of (a)(5); added (a)(9); inserted (b); and redesignated former (b) as (c).
